Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Default.

Sec. 45.29.601.
Rights after default; judicial enforcement; consignor or buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

After default, a secured party has the rights provided in AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.602

, those provided by agreement of the parties. A secured party

may reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose, or otherwise enforce the claim, security interest, or agricultural lien by available judicial procedures; and

if the collateral is documents, may proceed either as to the documents or as to the goods the documents cover.

A secured party in possession of collateral or control of collateral under AS

45.07.116

, AS

45.29.104

,

45.29.105

,

45.29.106

, or

45.29.107

has the rights and duties provided in AS

45.29.207

.

The rights under (a) and (b) of this section are cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section and AS

45.29.605

, after default, a debtor and an obligor have the rights provided in this part and by agreement of the parties.

If a secured party has reduced its claim to judgment, the lien of a levy that may be made upon the collateral by virtue of an execution based on the judgment relates back to the earliest of the date

of perfection of the security interest or agricultural lien in the collateral;

of filing a financing statement covering the collateral; or

specified in a statute under which the agricultural lien was created.

A sale pursuant to an execution is a foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial procedure within the meaning of this section. A secured party may purchase at the sale and thereafter hold the collateral free of any other requirements of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.607(c)

, AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

impose no duties on a secured party that is a consignor or is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 110 ch 44 SLA 2009; am § 30 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), added “AS

45.07.116

” following “control of collateral under”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (g), substituted “AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

impose” for “45.29.601 —

45.29.628

imposes” following “provided in AS

45.29.607(c)

,”.

Sec. 45.29.602.
Waiver and variance of rights and duties.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.624

, to the extent that they give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on a secured party, the debtor or obligor may not waive or vary the rules stated in the following sections:

AS

45.29.207(b)(4)(C)

, which deals with use and operation of the collateral by the secured party;

AS

45.29.210

, which deals with requests for an accounting and requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account;

AS

45.29.607(c)

, which deals with collection and enforcement of collateral;

AS

45.29.608(a)

and

45.29.615(c)

to the extent that they deal with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection, enforcement, or disposition;

AS

45.29.608(a)

and

45.29.615(d)

to the extent that they require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral;

AS

45.29.609

to the extent that it imposes on a secured party that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the duty to do so without breach of the peace;

AS

45.29.610(b)

,

45.29.611

,

45.29.613

, and

45.29.614

, which deal with disposition of collateral;

AS

45.29.615(f)

, which deals with calculation of a deficiency or surplus when a disposition is made to the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor;

AS

45.29.616

, which deals with explanation of the calculation of a surplus or deficiency;

AS

45.29.620

—

45.29.622

, which deal with acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation;

AS

45.29.623

, which deals with redemption of collateral;

AS

45.29.624

, which deals with permissible waivers; and

AS

45.29.625

and

45.29.626

, which deal with the secured party’s liability for failure to comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.603.
Agreement on standards concerning rights and duties.

The parties may determine by agreement the standards measuring the fulfillment of the rights of a debtor or obligor and the duties of a secured party under a rule stated in AS

45.29.602

if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to the duty under AS

45.29.609

to refrain from breaching the peace.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.604.
Procedure if security agreement covers real property or fixtures.

If a security agreement covers both personal and real property, a secured party may proceed

under AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

as to the personal property without prejudicing any rights with respect to the real property; or

as to both the personal property and the real property in accordance with the rights with respect to the real property, in which case the other provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

do not apply.

Subject to (c) of this section, if a security agreement covers goods that are or become fixtures, a secured party may proceed

under AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

; or

in accordance with the rights with respect to real property, in which case the other provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

do not apply.

Subject to the other provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

, if a secured party holding a security interest in fixtures has priority over all owners and encumbrancers of the real property, the secured party, after default, may remove the collateral from the real property.

A secured party that removes collateral shall promptly reimburse an encumbrancer or owner of the real property, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of physical injury caused by the removal. The secured party need not reimburse the encumbrancer or owner for diminution in value of the real property caused by the absence of the goods removed or by the necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.605.
Unknown debtor or secondary obligor.

A secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as secured party to

a person who is a debtor or obligor unless the secured party knows

that the person is a debtor or obligor;

the identity of the person; and

how to communicate with the person; or

a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person unless the secured party knows

that the person is a debtor; and

the identity of the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.606.
Time of default for agricultural lien.

For purposes of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

, a default occurs in connection with an agricultural lien at the time the secured party becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.607.
Collection and enforcement by secured party.

If so agreed and, in any event, after default, a secured party

may notify an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to or for the benefit of the secured party;

may take proceeds to which the secured party is entitled under AS

45.29.315

;

may enforce the obligations of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the debtor with respect to the obligation of the account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to the debtor and with respect to property that secures the obligations of the account debtor or other person obligated on the collateral;

if it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under AS

45.29.104(a)(1)

, may apply the balance of the deposit account to the obligation secured by the deposit account; and

if it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under AS

45.29.104(a)(2)

or (3), may instruct the bank to pay the balance of the deposit account to or for the benefit of the secured party.

If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise under (a)(3) of this section the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the secured party may record in the office in which the mortgage is recorded

a copy of the security agreement that creates or provides for a security interest in the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

the secured party’s sworn affidavit in recordable form stating that

a default has occurred with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

the secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage nonjudicially.

A secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if the secured party

undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral; and

is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor.

A secured party may deduct from the collections made under (c) of this section reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement, including reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

This section does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other person obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 25 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (d) of this section on Rule 79, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 32, ch. 113, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (b)(2)(A), inserted “with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage” following “occurred”.

Sec. 45.29.608.
Application of proceeds of collection or enforcement; liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance of an obligation, the following rules apply:

a secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of collection or enforcement under AS

45.29.607

in the following order to

the reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made; and

the satisfaction of obligations secured by a subordinate security interest in or other lien on the collateral subject to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made if the secured party receives an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed;

if requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time; unless the holder complies, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under (1)(C) of this subsection;

a secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of collection and enforcement under AS

45.29.607

unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable; a secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner;

a secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus, and the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the debtor is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (a)(1)(A) of this section on Rule 79, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 32, ch. 113, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 45.29.609.
Secured party’s right to take possession after default.

After default, a secured party

may take possession of the collateral; and

without removal, may render equipment unusable and dispose of collateral on a debtor’s premises under AS

45.29.610

.

A secured party may proceed under subsection (a) of this section

in accordance with judicial process; or

without judicial process if it proceeds without breach of the peace.

If so agreed and, in any event, after default, a secured party may require the debtor to assemble the collateral and make it available to the secured party at a place to be designated by the secured party that is reasonably convenient to both parties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.610.
Disposition of collateral after default.

After default, a secured party may sell, lease, license, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the collateral in its present condition or following commercially reasonable preparation or processing.

Every aspect of a disposition of collateral, including the method, manner, time, place, and other terms, must be commercially reasonable. If commercially reasonable, a secured party may dispose of collateral by public or private proceedings, by one or more contracts, as a unit or in parcels, and at any time and place and on any terms.

A secured party may purchase collateral

at a public disposition; or

at a private disposition only if the collateral is of a kind that is customarily sold on a recognized market or the subject of widely distributed standard price quotations.

A contract for sale, lease, license, or other disposition includes the warranties relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, and the like that by operation of law accompany a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract.

A secured party may disclaim or modify warranties under (d) of this section

in a manner that would be effective to disclaim or modify the warranties in a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract of disposition; or

by communicating to the purchaser a record evidencing the contract for disposition and including an express disclaimer or modification of the warranties.

A record is sufficient to disclaim warranties under (e) of this section if it indicates “There is no warranty relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, or the like in this disposition” or uses words of similar import.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.611.
Notification before disposition of collateral.

In this section, “notification date” means the earlier of the date on which

a secured party sends to the debtor and any secondary obligor an authenticated notification of disposition; or

the debtor and any secondary obligor waive the right to notification.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, a secured party that disposes of collateral under AS

45.29.610

shall send to the persons specified in (c) of this section a reasonable authenticated notification of disposition.

To comply with (b) of this section, the secured party shall send an authenticated notification of disposition to

the debtor;

any secondary obligor; and

if the collateral is other than consumer goods,

any other person from which the secured party has received, before the notification date, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

any other secured party or lienholder that, 10 days before the notification date, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that

identified the collateral;

was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

was filed in the office in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

any other secured party that, 10 days before the notification date, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in AS

45.29.311(a)

.

The provisions of (b) of this section do not apply if the collateral is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in value or is of a type customarily sold on a recognized market.

A secured party complies with the requirement for notification prescribed by (c)(3)(B) of this section if

not later than 20 days or earlier than 30 days before the notification date, the secured party requests, in a commercially reasonable manner, information concerning financing statements indexed under the debtor’s name in the office indicated in (c)(3)(B) of this section; and

before the notification date, the secured party

did not receive a response to the request for information; or

received a response to the request for information and sent an authenticated notification of disposition to each secured party or other lienholder named in that response whose financing statement covered the collateral.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.612.
Timeliness of notification before disposition of collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, whether a notification is sent within a reasonable time is a question of fact.

In a transaction other than a consumer transaction, a notification of disposition sent after default and 10 days or more before the earliest time of disposition set out in the notification is sent within a reasonable time before the disposition.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.613.
General notification before disposition of collateral.

Except in a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

the contents of a notification of disposition are sufficient if the notification

describes the debtor and the secured party;

describes the collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition;

states the method of intended disposition;

states that the debtor is entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness and states the charge, if any, for an accounting; and

states the time and place of a public disposition or the time after which any other disposition is to be made;

whether the contents of a notification that lacks any of the information specified in (1) of this section are nevertheless sufficient is a question of fact;

the contents of a notification providing substantially the information specified in (1) of this section are sufficient even if the notification includes

information not specified by that paragraph; or

minor errors that are not seriously misleading;

a particular phrasing of the notification is not required;

the following form of notification and the form appearing in AS

45.29.614

(3), when completed, each provide sufficient information:

NOTIFICATION OF DISPOSITION OF COLLATERAL To:
(Name of debtor, obligor, or other person to which the notification is sent)
From:
(Name, address, and telephone number of secured party)
Name of Debtor(s):
(Include only if debtor(s) are not an addressee)
(For a public disposition:) We will sell (or lease or license, as applicable) the (to the highest qualified bidder) in public as follows:
(describe collateral)
Day and Date: Time: Place: (For a private disposition:) We will sell (or lease or license, as applicable) the privately sometime after .
(describe collateral)
(day and date)
You are entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness secured by the property that we intend to sell (or lease or license, as applicable) (for a charge of $ ). You may request an accounting by calling us at .
(telephone number)

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of the introductory language in (5), substituted “each provide sufficient information” for “each provides sufficient information”.

Collateral references. —

Sufficiency of secured party’s notification of sale or other intended disposition of collateral under UCC § 9-504(3), 11 ALR4th 1061.

Sec. 45.29.614.
Notification before disposition of collateral in consumer goods transaction.

In a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

a notification of disposition must provide the following information:

the information specified in AS

45.29.613

(1);

a description of any liability for a deficiency of the person to which the notification is sent;

a telephone number from which the amount that must be paid to the secured party to redeem the collateral under AS

45.29.623

is available; and

a telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the disposition and the obligation secured is available.

a particular phrasing of the notification is not required;

the following form of notification, when completed, provides sufficient information:

a notification in the form of (3) of this section is sufficient even if additional information appears at the end of the form;

a notification in the form of (3) of this section is sufficient even if it includes errors in information not required by (1) of this section unless the error is misleading with respect to rights arising under this chapter;

if a notification under this section is not in the form set out in (3) of this section, law other than this chapter determines the effect of including information not required by (1) of this section.

(Name and address of secured party)
(Date)
NOTICE OF OUR PLAN TO SELL PROPERTY
(Name and address of any obligor who is also a debtor)
Subject:
(Identification of Transaction)
We have your , because you broke promises in our agreement.
(describe collateral)
(For a public disposition:) We will sell at public sale. A sale could include a lease or license. The sale will be held as follows:
(describe collateral)
Date: Time: Place: You may attend the sale and bring budders if you want. (For a public disposition:) We will sell at private sale sometime after . A sale cold include a lease or license.
(describe collateral)
(date)
The money that we get from the sale, after paying our costs, will reduce the amount you owe. If we get less money than you owe, you still owe us the difference. If we get more money than you owe, you will get the extra money, unless we must pay it to someone else.
(will or will not, as applicable)
You can get the property back at any time before we sell it by paying us the full amount you owe (not just the past due payments), including our expenses. To learn the exact amount you must pay, call us at .
(telephone number)
If you want us to explain to you in writing how we have figured the amount that you owe us, you may call us at an request a written explanation. (We will charge you $ for the explanation if we sent you another written explanation of the amount you owe within the last six months.)
(telephone number)
If you need more information about the sale call us at (or write us at .
(telephone number)
(secured party’s address)
We are sending this notice to the following other people who have an interest in or who owe money under your agreement:
(describe collateral)
.
(Names of all other debtors and obligors, if any)

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.615.
Application of proceeds of disposition; liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of disposition under AS

45.29.610

in the following order:

the reasonable expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made;

the satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other subordinate lien on the collateral if

the secured party receives from the holder of the subordinate security interest or other lien an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed; and

in a case in which a consignor has an interest in the collateral, the subordinate security interest or other lien is senior to the interest of the consignor; and

a secured party that is a consignor of the collateral if the secured party receives from the consignor an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder does so, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under (a)(3) of this section.

A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of disposition under AS

45.29.610

unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

If the security interest under which a disposition is made secures payment or performance of an obligation, after making the payments and applications required by (a) of this section and permitted by (c) of this section,

unless (a)(4) of this section requires the secured party to apply or pay over cash proceeds to a consignor, the secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus; and

the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes,

the debtor is not entitled to any surplus; and

the obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

The surplus or deficiency after a disposition is calculated based on the amount of proceeds that would have been realized in a disposition complying with AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

to a transferee other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor if

the transferee in the disposition is the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor; and

the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of proceeds that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

A secured party who receives cash proceeds of a disposition in good faith and without knowledge that the receipt violates the rights of the holder of a security interest or other lien that is not subordinate to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made

takes the cash proceeds free of the security interest or other lien;

is not obligated to apply the proceeds of the disposition to the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or other lien; and

is not obligated to account to or pay the holder of the security interest or other lien for any surplus.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (a)(1) of this section on Rule 79, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 32,
ch. 113, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 45.29.616.
Explanation of calculation of surplus or deficiency.

In this section,

“explanation” means a writing that

states the amount of the surplus or deficiency;

provides an explanation in accordance with (c) of this section of how the secured party calculated the surplus or deficiency;

states, if applicable, that future debits, credits, charges, including additional credit service charges or interest, rebates, and expenses may affect the amount of the surplus or deficiency; and

provides a telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the transaction is available;

“request” means a record

authenticated by a debtor or consumer obligor;

requesting that the recipient provide an explanation; and

sent after disposition of the collateral under AS

45.29.610

.

In a consumer goods transaction in which the debtor is entitled to a surplus or a consumer obligor is liable for a deficiency under AS

45.29.615

, the secured party shall

send an explanation to the debtor or consumer obligor, as applicable, after the disposition and

before or when the secured party accounts to the debtor and pays any surplus or first makes written demand on the consumer obligor after the disposition for payment of the deficiency; and

within 14 days after receipt of a request; or

in the case of a consumer obligor who is liable for a deficiency, within 14 days after receipt of a request, send to the consumer obligor a record waiving the secured party’s right to a deficiency.

To comply with (a)(1)(B) of this section, a writing must provide the following information in the following order:

the aggregate amount of obligations secured by the security interest under which the disposition was made, and, if the amount reflects a rebate of unearned interest or credit service charge, an indication of that fact, calculated as of a specified date

if the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral after default, not more than 35 days before the secured party takes or receives possession; or

if the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral before default or does not take possession of the collateral, not more than 35 days before the disposition;

the amount of proceeds of the disposition;

the aggregate amount of the obligations after deducting the amount of proceeds;

the amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of expenses, including expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing of the collateral, and attorney fees secured by the collateral that are known to the secured party and relate to the current disposition;

the amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of credits, including rebates of interest or credit service charges, to which the obligor is known to be entitled and that are not reflected in the amount in (1) of this subsection; and

the amount of the surplus or deficiency.

A particular phrasing of the explanation is not required. An explanation complying substantially with the requirements of (a) of this section is sufficient even if it includes minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

A debtor or consumer obligor is entitled without charge to one response to a request under this section during any six-month period in which the secured party did not send to the debtor or consumer obligor an explanation under (b)(1) of this section. The secured party may require payment of a charge not exceeding $25 for each additional response.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.617.
Rights of transferee of collateral.

A secured party’s disposition of collateral after default

transfers to a transferee for value all of the debtor’s rights in the collateral;

discharges the security interest under which the disposition is made; and

discharges any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien.

A transferee who acts in good faith takes free of the rights and interests described in (a) of this section even if the secured party fails to comply with this chapter or the requirements of a judicial proceeding.

If a transferee does not take free of the rights and interests described in (a) of this section, the transferee takes the collateral subject to

the debtor’s rights in the collateral;

the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made; and

any other security interest or other lien.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.618.
Rights and duties of certain secondary obligors.

A secondary obligor acquires the rights and becomes obligated to perform the duties of the secured party after the secondary obligor

receives an assignment of a secured obligation from the secured party;

receives a transfer of collateral from the secured party and agrees to accept the rights and assume the duties of the secured party; or

is subrogated to the rights of a secured party with respect to collateral.

An assignment, transfer, or subrogation described in (a) of this section

is not a disposition of collateral under AS

45.29.610

; and

relieves the secured party of further duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.619.
Transfer of record or legal title.

In this section, “transfer statement” means a record authenticated by a secured party stating

that the debtor has defaulted in connection with an obligation secured by specified collateral;

that the secured party has exercised its post-default remedies with respect to the collateral;

that, by reason of the exercise, a transferee has acquired the rights of the debtor in the collateral; and

the name and mailing address of the secured party, debtor, and transferee.

A transfer statement entitles the transferee to the transfer of record of all rights of the debtor in the collateral specified in the statement in an official filing, recording, registration, or certificate-of-title system covering the collateral. If a transfer statement is presented with the applicable fee and request form to the official or office responsible for maintaining the system, the official or office shall

accept the transfer statement;

promptly amend its records to reflect the transfer; and

if applicable, issue a new appropriate certificate of title in the name of the transferee.

A transfer of the record or legal title to collateral to a secured party under (b) of this section or otherwise is not of itself a disposition of collateral under this chapter and does not of itself relieve the secured party of its duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.620.
Acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of obligation; compulsory disposition of collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a secured party may accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if

the debtor consents to the acceptance under (c) of this section;

the secured party does not receive, within the time set out in (d) of this section, a notification of objection to the proposal authenticated by

a person to which the secured party was required to send a proposal under AS

45.29.621

; or

any other person, other than the debtor, holding an interest in the collateral subordinate to the security interest that is the subject of the proposal;

if the collateral is consumer goods, the collateral is not in the possession of the debtor when the debtor consents to the acceptance; and

the provisions of (e) of this section do not require the secured party to dispose of the collateral or the debtor waives the requirement under AS

45.29.624

.

A purported or apparent acceptance of collateral under this section is ineffective unless

the secured party consents to the acceptance in an authenticated record or sends a proposal to the debtor; and

the conditions of (a) of this section are met.

For purposes of this section, a debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral

in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default; and

in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default or the secured party

sends to the debtor after default a proposal that is unconditional or subject only to a condition that collateral not in the possession of the secured party be preserved or maintained;

in the proposal, proposes to accept collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures; and

does not receive a notification of objection authenticated by the debtor within 20 days after the proposal is sent.

To be effective under (a)(2) of this section, a notification of objection must be received by the secured party

in the case of a person to which the proposal was sent under AS

45.29.621

, within 20 days after notification was sent to that person; and

in other cases,

within 20 days after the last notification was sent under AS

45.29.621

; or

if a notification was not sent, before the debtor consents to the acceptance under (c) of this section.

A secured party that has taken possession of collateral shall dispose of the collateral under AS

45.29.610

within the time specified in (f) of this section if

60 percent of the cash price has been paid in the case of a purchase money security interest in consumer goods; or

60 percent of the principal amount of the obligation secured has been paid in the case of a nonpurchase money security interest in consumer goods.

To comply with (e) of this section, the secured party shall dispose of the collateral within

90 days after taking possession; or

any longer period to which the debtor and all secondary obligors have agreed in an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

In a consumer transaction, a secured party may not accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.621.
Notification of proposal to accept collateral.

A secured party who desires to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to

any person from which the secured party has received, before the debtor consented to the acceptance, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

any other secured party or lienholder who, 10 days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that

identified the collateral;

was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

was filed in the office or offices in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

any other secured party who, 10 days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in AS

45.29.311(a)

.

A secured party who desires to accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to any secondary obligor in addition to the persons described in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.622.
Effect of acceptance of collateral.

A secured party’s acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures

discharges the obligation to the extent consented to by the debtor;

transfers to the secured party all of a debtor’s rights in the collateral;

discharges the security interest or agricultural lien that is the subject of the debtor’s consent and any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien; and

terminates any other subordinate interest.

A subordinate interest is discharged or terminated under (a) of this section, even if the secured party fails to comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)